src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
    ræma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ræmdur
    ræma+V+Sup: ræmt
    ræna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: rænir
    ræna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: rændu
    ræna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: rændi
    ræna+V+Inf: ræna
    ræna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rændur
    ræna+V+Sup: rænt
    ræsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ræsir
    ræsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ræstu
    ræsa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: ræsti
    ræsa+V+Inf: ræsa
    ræsa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ræstur
    ræsa+V+Sup: ræst
    rætta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [rættar, rættir]
    rætta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [rættaðu, rættu]
    rætta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: rættaði
    rætta+V+Inf: rætta
    rætta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rættaður
    rætta+V+Sup: [rætt, rættað]
    rættleiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: rættleiðir
    rættleiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: rættleiddu
    rættleiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: rættleiddi
    rættleiða+V+Inf: rættleiða
    rættleiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rættleiddur
    rættleiða+V+Sup: rættleitt
    ræða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ræðir
    ræða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ræddu
    ræða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: ræddi
    ræða+V+Inf: ræða
    ræða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: ræddur
    ræða+V+Sup: rætt
    rógva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: rógvar
    rógva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: rógvaðu
    rógva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: rógvaði
    rógva+V+Inf: rógva
    rógva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rógvaður
    rógva+V+Sup: rógvað
    røkka+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: røkkur
    røkka+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [rakk, røkk]
    røkka+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: rukku
    røkka+V+Inf: røkka
    røkka+V+Sup: rokkið
    røra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: rørir
    røra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: rørdu
    røra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: rørdi
    røra+V+Inf: røra
    røra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rørdur
    røra+V+Sup: rørt
    rýma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: rýmir
    rýma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: rýmdu
    rýma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: rýmdi
    rýma+V+Inf: rýma
    rýma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rýmdur
    rýma+V+Sup: rýmt
    rýta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: rýtir
    rýta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: rýttu
    rýta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: rýtti
    rýta+V+Inf: rýta
    rýta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rýttur
    rýta+V+Sup: rýtt
    rýða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: rýðir
    rýða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: rýddu
    rýða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: rýddi
    rýða+V+Inf: rýða
    rýða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: rýddur
    rýða+V+Sup: rýtt
    sakfella+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sakfellir
    sakfella+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sakfeldu
    sakfella+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sakfeldi
    sakfella+V+Inf: sakfella
    sakfella+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sakfeldur
    sakfella+V+Sup: sakfelt
    saltstroya+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: saltstroyir
    saltstroya+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: saltstroyddu
    saltstroya+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: saltstroyddi
    saltstroya+V+Inf: saltstroya
    saltstroya+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: saltstroyddur
    saltstroya+V+Sup: saltstroytt
    samarbeiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: samarbeiðir
    samarbeiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: samarbeiddu
    samarbeiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: samarbeiddi
    samarbeiða+V+Inf: samarbeiða
    samarbeiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: samarbeiddur
    samarbeiða+V+Sup: samarbeitt
    sambreiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sambreiðir
    sambreiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sambreiddu
    sambreiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sambreiddi
    sambreiða+V+Inf: sambreiða
    sambreiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sambreiddur
    sambreiða+V+Sup: sambreitt
    sameina+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [sameinar, sameinir]
    sameina+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [sameinaðu, sameindu]
    sameina+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [sameinaði, sameindi]
    sameina+V+Inf: sameina
    sameina+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [sameinaður, sameindur]
    sameina+V+Sup: [sameinað, sameint]
    samføra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: samførir
    samføra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: samførdu
    samføra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: samførdi
    samføra+V+Inf: samføra
    samføra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: samførdur
    samføra+V+Sup: samført
    sammeta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sammetir
    sammeta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sammettu
    sammeta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sammetti
    sammeta+V+Inf: sammeta
    sammeta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sammettur
    sammeta+V+Sup: sammett
    samrøða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: samrøðir
    samrøða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: samrøddu
    samrøða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: samrøddi
    samrøða+V+Inf: samrøða
    samrøða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: samrøddur
    samrøða+V+Sup: samrøtt
    samsýna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: samsýnir
    samsýna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: samsýndu
    samsýna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: samsýndi
    samsýna+V+Inf: samsýna
    samsýna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: samsýndur
    samsýna+V+Sup: samsýnt
    sandstroya+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sandstroyir
    sandstroya+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sandstroyddu
    sandstroya+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sandstroyddi
    sandstroya+V+Inf: sandstroya
    sandstroya+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sandstroyddur
    sandstroya+V+Sup: sandstroytt
    sannføra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sannførir
    sannføra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sannførdu
    sannføra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sannførdi
    sannføra+V+Inf: sannføra
    sannføra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sannførdur
    sannføra+V+Sup: sannført
    sannkenna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sannkennir
    sannkenna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sannkendu
    sannkenna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sannkendi
    sannkenna+V+Inf: sannkenna
    sannkenna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sannkendur
    sannkenna+V+Sup: sannkent
    sannroyna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sannroynir
    sannroyna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sannroyndu
    sannroyna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sannroyndi
    sannroyna+V+Inf: sannroyna
    sannroyna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sannroyndur
    sannroyna+V+Sup: sannroynt
    sannvísa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sannvísir
    sannvísa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sannvístu
    sannvísa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sannvísti
    sannvísa+V+Inf: sannvísa
    sannvísa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sannvístur
    sannvísa+V+Sup: sannvíst
    savngoyma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: savngoymir
    savngoyma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: savngoymdu
    savngoyma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: savngoymdi
    savngoyma+V+Inf: savngoyma
    savngoyma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: savngoymdur
    savngoyma+V+Sup: savngoymt
    seigpína+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: seigpínir
    seigpína+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: seigpíndu
    seigpína+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: seigpíndi
    seigpína+V+Inf: seigpína
    seigpína+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: seigpíndur
    seigpína+V+Sup: seigpínt
    senda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sendir
    senda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sendu
    senda+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sendi
    senda+V+Inf: senda
    senda+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sendur
    senda+V+Sup: sent
    sergreina+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [sergreinar, sergreinir]
    sergreina+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [sergreinaðu, sergreindu]
    sergreina+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [sergreinaði, sergreindi]
    sergreina+V+Inf: sergreina
    sergreina+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [sergreinaður, sergreindur]
    sergreina+V+Sup: [sergreinað, sergreint]
    siga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sigur
    siga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: segði
    siga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: søgdu
    siga+V+Inf: siga
    siga+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sagdur
    siga+V+Sup: sagt
    sigla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: siglir
    sigla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sigldu
    sigla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: sigldi
    sigla+V+Inf: sigla
    sigla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sigldur
    sigla+V+Sup: siglt
    skammdeila+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skammdeilir
    skammdeila+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skammdeildu
    skammdeila+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skammdeildi
    skammdeila+V+Inf: skammdeila
    skammdeila+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skammdeildur
    skammdeila+V+Sup: skammdeilt
    skammskemma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skammskemmir
    skammskemma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skammskemdu
    skammskemma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skammskemdi
    skammskemma+V+Inf: skammskemma
    skammskemma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skammskemdur
    skammskemma+V+Sup: skammskemt
    skaða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skaðar
    skaða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skaddu
    skaða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skaddi
    skaða+V+Inf: skaða
    skaða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skaddur
    skaða+V+Sup: skatt
    skeina+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [skeinar, skeinir]
    skeina+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [skeinaðu, skeindu]
    skeina+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [skeinaði, skeindi]
    skeina+V+Inf: skeina
    skeina+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [skeinaður, skeindur]
    skeina+V+Sup: [skeinað, skeint]
    skeipa+V+Inf: skeipa
    skeita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skeitir
    skeita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skeittu
    skeita+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skeitti
    skeita+V+Inf: skeita
    skeita+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skeittur
    skeita+V+Sup: skeitt
    skella+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skellir
    skella+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skeldu
    skella+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skeldi
    skella+V+Inf: skella
    skella+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skeldur
    skella+V+Sup: skelt
    skelva+V+Inf: skelva
    skemma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skemmir
    skemma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skemdu
    skemma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skemdi
    skemma+V+Inf: skemma
    skemma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skemdur
    skemma+V+Sup: skemt
    skerda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [skerdar, skerdir]
    skerda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [skerdaðu, skerdaði]
    skerda+V+Inf: skerda
    skerda+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skerdaður
    skerda+V+Sup: skerdað
    skerja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skerdu
    skerja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skerdi
    skerpa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skerpir
    skerpa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skerptu
    skerpa+V+Inf: skerpa
    skerpa+V+Sup: skerpt
    skildøma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skildømir
    skildøma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skildømdu
    skildøma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skildømdi
    skildøma+V+Inf: skildøma
    skildøma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skildømdur
    skildøma+V+Sup: skildømt
    skilmeta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skilmetir
    skilmeta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skilmettu
    skilmeta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skilmetti
    skilmeta+V+Inf: skilmeta
    skilmeta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skilmettur
    skilmeta+V+Sup: skilmett
    skjaða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skjaðir
    skjaða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skjaddu
    skjaða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skjaddi
    skjaða+V+Inf: skjaða
    skjaða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skjaddur
    skjaða+V+Sup: skjatt
    skjóla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [skjólar, skjólir]
    skjóla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [skjólaðu, skjóltu]
    skjóla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skjólaði
    skjóla+V+Inf: skjóla
    skjóla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skjólaður
    skjóla+V+Sup: [skjólað, skjólt]
    skjóta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skutu
    skjóta+V+Inf: skjóta
    skjóta+V+Sup: skotið
    skjúla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skjúlir
    skjúla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skjúldu
    skjúla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skjúldi
    skjúla+V+Inf: skjúla
    skjúla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skjúldur
    skjúla+V+Sup: skjúlt
    skotloysa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skotloysir
    skotloysa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skotloystu
    skotloysa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skotloysti
    skotloysa+V+Inf: skotloysa
    skotloysa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skotloystur
    skotloysa+V+Sup: skotloyst
    skoyna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skoynir
    skoyna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skoyndu
    skoyna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skoyndi
    skoyna+V+Inf: skoyna
    skoyna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skoyndur
    skoyna+V+Sup: skoynt
    skoyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [skoytar, skoytir]
    skoyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [skoytaðu, skoyttu]
    skoyta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [skoytaði, skoytti]
    skoyta+V+Inf: skoyta
    skoyta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [skoytaður, skoyttur]
    skoyta+V+Sup: [skoytað, skoytt]
    skreiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [skreiðar, skreiðir]
    skreiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [skreiddu, skreiðaðu]
    skreiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [skreiddi, skreiðaði]
    skreiða+V+Inf: skreiða
    skreiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [skreiddur, skreiðaður]
    skreiða+V+Sup: [skreitt, skreiðað]
    skreppa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [skreppar, skreppir]
    skreppa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [skreppaðu, skreptu]
    skreppa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skreppaði
    skreppa+V+Inf: skreppa
    skreppa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skreppaður
    skreppa+V+Sup: [skreppað, skrept]
    skroyva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skroyvir
    skroyva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skroyvdu
    skroyva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skroyvdi
    skroyva+V+Inf: skroyva
    skroyva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skroyvdur
    skroyva+V+Sup: skroyvt
    skræma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skræmir
    skræma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skræmdu
    skræma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skræmdi
    skræma+V+Inf: skræma
    skræma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skræmdur
    skræma+V+Sup: skræmt
    skræpa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [skræpar, skræpir]
    skræpa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [skræpaðu, skræptu]
    skræpa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [skræpaði, skræpti]
    skræpa+V+Inf: skræpa
    skræpa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [skræpaður, skræptur]
    skræpa+V+Sup: [skræpað, skræpt]
    skræða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skræðir
    skræða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skræddu
    skræða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skræddi
    skræða+V+Inf: skræða
    skræða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skræddur
    skræða+V+Sup: skrætt
    skríma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: skrímir
    skríma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: skrímdu
    skríma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: skrímdi
    skríma+V+Inf: skríma
    skríma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skrímdur
    skríma+V+Sup: skrímt
